West Virginia, session 2026, SB566.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS. §3-1-18a.  Term limits of elected officials. No person seeking a public office pursuant to §3-1-16, §3-1-17, and §3-1-18 of this code may serve more than three consecutive terms for the same office.  This restriction does not apply to partial terms to which an official may be appointed.